Hawaii statutes.
§291C-82 Turning so as to proceed in the
opposite direction. (a) No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in
the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the
crest of a grade, where such vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other
vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred feet.

(b) In addition to the prohibition in
subsection (a), the director of transportation is authorized to and the
counties may by ordinance with respect to highways under their respective
jurisdictions prohibit the turning of any vehicle so as to proceed in the
opposite direction on the highway at any location where such turning would be
dangerous to those using the highway or would unduly interfere with the free
movement of traffic.

(c) The director of transportation and the
counties by ordinance with respect to the highways under their respective
jurisdictions shall place signs which are clearly visible to an ordinarily
observant person prohibiting the turning of a vehicle to proceed in the
opposite direction. The signs shall be official signs and no person shall turn
any vehicle in violation of the restrictions stated on such signs. [L 1971, c
150, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 133, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next